Utah statutes.
67-1-12.   Displaced defense workers.

(1)  The governor, through the Department of Workforce Services, may use funds specifically appropriated by the Legislature to benefit, in a manner prescribed by Subsection (2):

(a)  Department of Defense employees within the state who lose their employment because of reductions in defense spending by the federal government;

(b)  persons dismissed by a defense-related industry employer because of reductions in federal government defense contracts received by the employer; and

(c)  defense-related businesses in the state that have been severely and adversely impacted because of reductions in defense spending.

(2) Funds appropriated under this section before fiscal year 1999-2000 but not expended shall remain with the agency that possesses the funds and shall be used in a manner consistent with this section. Any amount appropriated under this section in fiscal year 1999-2000 or thereafter may be used to:

(a)  provide matching or enhancement funds for grants, loans, or other assistance received by the state from the United States Department of Labor, Department of Defense, or other federal agency to assist in retraining, community assistance, or technology transfer activities;

(b)  fund or match available private or public funds from the state or local level to be used for retraining, community assistance, technology transfer, or educational projects coordinated by state or federal agencies;

(c)  provide for retraining, upgraded services, and programs at applied technology centers, public schools, higher education institutions, or any other appropriate public or private entity that are designed to teach specific job skills requested by a private employer in the state or required for occupations that are in demand in the state;

(d)  aid public or private entities that provide assistance in locating new employment;

(e)  inform the public of assistance programs available for persons who have lost their employment;

(f)  increase funding for assistance and retraining programs;

(g)  provide assistance for small start-up companies owned or operated by persons who have lost their employment;

(h)  enhance the implementation of dual-use technologies programs, community adjustment assistance programs, or other relevant programs under Pub. L. No. 102-484; and

(i)  coordinate local and national resources to protect and enhance current Utah defense installations and related operations and to facilitate conversion or enhancement efforts by:

(i)  creating and operating state information clearinghouse operations that monitor relevant activities on the federal, state, and local level;

(ii)  identifying, seeking, and matching funds from federal and other public agencies and private donors;

(iii)  identifying and coordinating needs in different geographic areas;

(iv)  coordinating training and retraining centers;

(v)  coordinating technology transfer efforts between public entities, private entities, and institutions of higher education;

(vi)  facilitating the development of local and national awareness and support for Utah defense installations;

(vii)  studying the creation of strategic alliances, tax incentives, and relocation and consolidation assistance; and

(viii)  exploring feasible alternative uses for the physical and human resources at defense installations and in related industries should reductions in mission occur.

(3)  The governor, through the Department of Workforce Services, may coordinate and administer the expenditure of money under this section and collaborate with applied technology centers, public institutions of higher learning, or other appropriate public or private entities to provide retraining and other services described in Subsection (2).

